Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
General Provisions
§ 63-7-59.
Windows and window glass generally; windshield wipers; tinted or darkened windows prohibited unless certified; additional fee for inspection stations conducting tests of light transmittance of motor vehicle windows; exceptions; penalties; public awareness program.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle required to be registered in this state upon the public roads, streets or highways in this state with any sign or poster, or with any glazing material which causes a mirrored effect, upon the front windshield, side wings or side or rear windows of the vehicle, other than a certificate or other paper required or authorized to be so displayed by law. No person shall drive any motor vehicle required to be registered in this state upon the public roads, streets or highways in this state with any tinted film, glazing material or darkening material of any kind on the windshield of a motor vehicle except material designed to replace or provide a sun shield in the uppermost area as authorized to be installed by manufacturers of vehicles under federal law.

From and after July 1, 2006, no person shall drive any motor vehicle required to be registered in this state upon the public roads, streets or highways in this state with any window tinted or darkened, by tinted film or otherwise, unless:

The windshield of the vehicle has affixed to it a label as provided under subsection (6) of this section certifying that all the windows of the vehicle have a light transmittance of twenty-eight percent (28%) or more; or

The owner or operator of the vehicle has a certificate of medical exemption issued under subsection (4) of this section.

The prohibitions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:

School buses, other buses used for public transportation, any bus or van owned or leased by a nonprofit organization duly incorporated under the laws of this state or any funeral home services vehicle, any limousine owned or leased by a private or public entity, or any government-owned law enforcement or fire department vehicle or any volunteer fire department vehicle;

Any window behind the front two (2) side windows, including the rear window, of any pickup truck, van, motor home, recreational vehicle, sport utility vehicle or multipurpose vehicle that has been tinted or darkened after factory delivery to the extent that the light transmittance of the window meets the minimum light transmittance requirements authorized to be installed for that window and for that vehicle under federal law or regulations before factory delivery; or

Any other motor vehicle the windows of which have been tinted or darkened before factory delivery as permitted by federal law or federal regulations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, it shall be lawful for any person who has been diagnosed by a physician licensed to practice medicine in the State of Mississippi as having a physical condition or disease that is seriously aggravated by minimum exposure to sunlight to place or have placed upon the windshield or windows of any motor vehicle which he owns or operates or within which he regularly travels as a passenger tinted film or other darkening material that would otherwise be in violation of this section. However, any vehicle, in order to be exempt under this subsection (4), shall have prominently displayed on the vehicle dashboard a certificate of medical exemption on a form prepared by the Commissioner of Public Safety and signed by the person on whose behalf the certificate is issued. The special certificate authorized by this subsection (4) shall be issued free of charge to the applicants through the offices of the tax collectors of the counties. Each applicant shall present to the issuing official:

An affidavit signed personally by the applicant and signed and attested by a physician which states the applicant’s physical condition or disease which entitles him to an exemption under this subsection (4); and

Proof of ownership of the motor vehicle by the applicant, or a signed affidavit by the owner of a motor vehicle operated for the use of the applicant, for which he is obtaining the certificate.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle.

The Department of Public Safety shall issue labels to official tint inspection stations for affixing to the windshield of every motor vehicle required to be inspected in this state with a window therein which has been tinted or darkened with any tinted film or other darkening material after factory delivery. The label shall be affixed to the lower left corner of the windshield, shall be legible from outside the vehicle, and shall indicate the label registration number, a certification of compliance with Mississippi law, and such other information as the Commissioner of Public Safety deems appropriate. The labels shall be of a type which is pressure-sensitive, self-destructive upon removal, and no larger than one (1) inch square in size. Before affixing the label, the inspection station shall conduct a test to determine that the window complies with the light transmittance requirements prescribed under subsection (2) of this section. The test shall be conducted using such methods or devices as may be approved and certified not less often than annually by the Department of Public Safety. For conducting such tests, tint inspection stations shall charge and collect a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00). Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee shall be retained by the inspection station, and Three Dollars ($3.00) of the fee shall be remitted to the Department of Public Safety and may be expended, upon legislative appropriation, for the operational expenses of the department. No fee shall be charged unless a test is actually performed under this subsection (6). The presence of a label upon the windshield of a motor vehicle shall indicate that the person who affixed the label certifies that the windows of the vehicle meet the restrictions of subsection (2) of this section as to light transmittance.

No person shall install any tinted film, darkening material, glazing material or any other material upon the windshield or any window of a motor vehicle which, after the installation thereof, would result in such vehicle being in violation of subsection (2) of this section.

No label shall be issued for a vehicle on which the windshield or any window of the vehicle has been darkened by the installation of tinted film or by other means, except as authorized under this section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to alter or reproduce any label or certificate of medical exemption approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety under this section for the purpose of misleading law enforcement officers or motor vehicle inspection stations, or to knowingly use any approved label or certificate except as authorized by this section.

Any person violating subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this section, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three (3) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any violation of this section other than a violation of subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this section shall be punishable upon conviction as provided in Section 63-7-7.

Violations of this section shall be enforced only by law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and municipal law enforcement officers of municipalities having a population of two thousand (2,000) or more on the public roads, streets and highways under their jurisdiction.

The Department of Public Safety shall initiate a public awareness program designed to inform and educate persons of the provisions of this section. Funds for such public awareness program shall be available through the office of the Governor’s representative for highway safety programs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8253; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1983, ch. 416; Laws, 1988, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 417, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-7-60.
Annual permits to official tint inspection stations for inspection of windshields and issuance of labels as required by Section 63-7-59.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall annually issue permits for and furnish instructions and all necessary forms to official tint inspection stations for the inspection of windshields and issuance of any label as required by Section 63-7-59.

Application for a permit to operate an official tint inspection station shall be made on an official form and shall be granted only when the Commissioner of Public Safety is satisfied that the station is properly equipped and has competent personnel to make the inspection required by Section 63-7-59 and that the inspections will be properly conducted. A fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be charged any person or facility seeking a permit as an official tint inspection station, or a renewal thereof, for the purpose of defraying the cost of administering the processing of the application.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall properly supervise and cause inspections to be made of official tint stations and may, after reasonable notice, suspend or revoke and require the surrender of the permit issued to a station which he finds is not properly equipped or conducted. The Commissioner of Public Safety shall maintain and post at the Office of the Department of Public Safety lists of all stations holding permits and of those whose permits have been suspended or revoked.

The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized to make necessary rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this section and Section 63-7-59, including a reasonable provision for the bonding of official tint inspection stations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-7-61.
Safety glass.

No person shall sell any new motor vehicle nor shall any new motor vehicle be registered unless such motor vehicle is equipped with safety glass throughout.

No person shall replace any glass in any motor vehicle except with safety glass, provided same can be easily or readily obtained.

The term “safety glass” shall mean any product composed of glass, so manufactured, fabricated, or treated as substantially to prevent shattering and flying of the glass when struck or broken or such other or similar product as may be approved by the department.

The department shall compile and publish a list of types of glass by name approved by it as meeting the requirements of this section. The State Tax Commission and county tax collectors shall not register any motor vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this section unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety glass, and the State Tax Commission shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle so subject to this section which it finds is not so equipped until it is made to conform to the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8255; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-7-62.
Unlawful installation of an object in lieu of an airbag.

Any person who knowingly installs or reinstalls any object in lieu of an airbag that was designed in accordance with federal safety regulations for the make, model and year of vehicle, as a part of a vehicle inflatable restraint system, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 63-7-63.
Safety belts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to buy, sell, lease, trade or transfer from or to Mississippi residents, at retail, an automobile which is manufactured or assembled commencing with the 1963 models, unless such automobile is equipped with safety belts installed for use in the left front and right front seats thereof. The violation of the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, the violator shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00), for each offense.

All such safety belts shall be of such type and be installed in a manner approved by the department of public safety of the State of Mississippi. The department shall establish specifications and requirements of approved types of safety belts and attachments. The department will accept, as approved, all seat belt installations and the belt and anchor meeting the specifications of the Society of Automotive Engineers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8254.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 532, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 63-7-64.
Motorcycle or motor scooter crash helmets.

No person shall operate or ride upon any motorcycle or motor scooter upon the public roads or highways of this state unless such person is wearing on his or her head a crash helmet that complies with minimum guidelines established by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration pursuant to federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 218 (49 CFR 571.218). Violation of this section shall be deemed a violation of the traffic regulations and rules of the road and punishable as provided by Section 63-9-11. This section shall not apply to a person operating an autocycle as defined in Section 63-3-103 or persons riding any motorcycle or motor scooter in a parade, at a speed not to exceed thirty (30) miles per hour, if the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 461; Laws, 2012, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 406, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-7-65.
Horns and other warning devices.

Every motor vehicle when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred (200) feet. The driver of a motor vehicle shall, when reasonably necessary to insure safe operation, give audible warning with his horn but shall not otherwise use such horn upon a highway. No horn or other warning device shall emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle.

Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet and of a type approved by the department. No such siren shall be used except when such vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which said latter events the driver of such vehicle shall sound such siren when necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the approach thereof.

No vehicle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any siren, whistle, or bell, except as otherwise permitted in this section. No bicycle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a bicycle any siren or whistle.

Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8250; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1994, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 63-7-67.
Tires.

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle shall have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one (1) inch thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery any block, stud, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberances of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire. However, it shall be permissible to use farm machinery with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway, and it shall be permissible to use tire chains of reasonable proportions upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may, in their discretion, issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of such movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8254; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-7-69.
Warning and safety appliances for trucks and buses; requirement; standards.

No person shall operate any truck or bus on any highway outside the limits of any municipality or residential section adjacent thereto between the hours of one half hour after sunset and one half hour before sunrise unless there be carried in such vehicle, ready for use, certain warning and safety appliances such as flares, fusees, flags, reflectors, fire extinguishers, and the like.

The nature of such appliances, methods of their use, and standards of their quality, shall be prescribed by the department with the condition that no appliance shall be prescribed whose quality is below the standards as follows: for fire extinguishers and flares, the standards adopted by the Interstate Commerce Commission; for fusees, the standards adopted by the Bureau of Explosives; for lights and reflectors, the standards adopted by the Society of Automotive Engineers or the Illuminating Engineers Society; and for any other appliance, the standards adopted by a recognized research body in its respective line. The commissioner shall approve any of the appliances mentioned herein when such appliance has been approved by or meets the minimum standards adopted by either the Interstate Commerce Commission, the Bureau of Explosives, the Society of Automotive Engineers, the Illuminating Engineers Society, or any other recognized research body in its respective line, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8256; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 11; Laws, 1954, ch. 329; Laws, 1962, ch. 528, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 63-7-71.
Warning and safety appliances for trucks and buses; display.

Whenever any motor truck or bus is stopped upon the highway except for the purpose of picking up or discharging passengers, or its lighting equipment is disabled during the period when lighted lamps must be displayed on vehicles and such motor truck or bus cannot immediately be removed from the main traveled portion of a highway outside of a business or residence district, the driver or other person in charge of such vehicle shall cause such flares, fusees, reflectors, or other signals to be lighted or otherwise placed in an operating condition and placed upon the highway, one at a distance of approximately one hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle, one approximately one hundred feet in advance of the vehicle and the third upon the roadway side of the vehicle. However, if the vehicle is transporting inflammables, no flares (pot torches) fusees, oil lanterns, or any signal produced by a flame, may be used, and in lieu of such signals, either (a) three red electric lanterns or flares and three red cloth flags, or (b) three emergency reflectors and three red cloth flags shall be used.

Whenever any motor truck or bus is stopped upon the highway except for the purpose of picking up or discharging passengers between the hours of one half hour before sunrise and one half hour after sunset, the driver or person in charge of such vehicle shall place upon the highway in a standing position red flags, one at a distance not less than one hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle and one not less than one hundred feet in advance of the vehicle and the third upon the roadway side of the vehicle.

No person shall at any time operate a motor truck transporting explosives as a cargo or part of a cargo upon the highway unless it carries (a) electric lanterns or flares and red cloth flags or (b) red emergency reflectors and red cloth flags as required in Section 63-7-69. Such electric flares, electric lanterns and emergency reflectors must be capable of producing a red light or red reflection and shall be displayed upon the roadway when and as required in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8256; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 11; Laws, 1954, ch. 329; Laws, 1962, ch. 528, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 63-7-73.
Protectors or flaps for rear wheels.

No person shall drive or operate or cause to be driven or operated, upon the public highways, streets, bridges and culverts within the State of Mississippi, or any subdivision thereof, any car, truck, truck-tractor, trailer or semi-trailer or bus used for the transportation of property or persons the gross weight of which, including load, exceeds ten tons unless such motor vehicle is equipped with suitable metal protectors or substantial flexible flaps on the rear-most wheels of such vehicle or combination of vehicles, so as to prevent as far as possible such wheels from throwing dirt, water and other materials on the windshields of following motor vehicles. However, pole trailers, dump trucks, and all trucks carrying an “F” license tag shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

Such protectors or flaps shall be constructed of substantial and suitable materials approved by the commissioner of public safety and shall have a ground clearance of not more than one-fifth of the distance from the center of the rear-most axle to the center of the flaps under any conditions of loading operation of the motor vehicle. They shall be at least as wide as the tires they are protecting. However, if the motor vehicle is so designed and constructed that the purposes of this section cannot be met, then, in the discretion of the commissioner of public safety, no such protectors or flaps shall be required. If the said rear-most wheels are not adequately covered at the top by fenders, body or other parts of the vehicle, the said protectors or flaps shall be extended to a point directly above the rear-most axle. Lamps or wiring shall not be attached to protectors or flaps, and any reflectors or reflectorized material attached to or made a part of the protectors or flaps shall be in addition to the reflectors required by law on the vehicle.

The commissioner of public safety is hereby charged with the duty of administering the provisions of this section.

Any person convicted for a violation of any of the provisions of this section shall for the first violation thereof be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days; for a second conviction such person shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) days.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8256.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 338, §§ 1-4, eff July 1, 1954.

§ 63-7-75.
Speedometers.

All motor vehicles operating on the public highways of this state, carrying passengers for hire, shall be equipped at all times with a speedometer, in good workable condition, reflecting the correct speed, with a dial sufficiently large to be read by the passengers on the said motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 63-7-77.
Vehicles transporting explosives.

Any person operating any vehicle transporting any explosive as a cargo or part of a cargo upon a highway shall at all times comply with the provisions of this section.

Said vehicle shall be marked or placarded on each side and the rear with the word “explosives” in letters not less than eight inches high, or there shall be displayed on the rear of such vehicle a red flag not less than twenty-four inches square marked with the word “danger” in white letters six inches high.

Every said vehicle shall be equipped with not less than two fire extinguishers, filled and ready for immediate use, and placed at a convenient point on the vehicle so used.

The commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to promulgate such additional regulations governing the transportation of explosives and other dangerous articles by vehicles upon the highways as he shall deem advisable for the protection of the public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8257; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-79.
Color of used school buses operated on highways for other than school purposes.

Any person who owns or operates a used school bus for the purpose of transportation or use of any kind on the public roads and highways of the State of Mississippi, other than for school purposes, shall change the color of such bus from the regular school bus color of yellow or national school bus chrome to a color in contrast to this color before such bus can be used or operated on the highways or public roads in Mississippi.

The vendor or owner of any school bus shall inform the purchaser in writing at or prior to the time of the sale of any bus not to be used for school purposes as to the requirements of this section.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 379, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1962).

§ 63-7-81.
Effect of chapter on right to recover damages in civil actions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to curtail or abridge the right of any person to prosecute a civil suit for damages by reason of injuries to person or property resulting from the negligent use of the highways by any motor vehicle, or its owner, or his employee or agent.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5785; 1930, § 5588; 1942, § 1742; Laws, 1916, ch. 116.

§ 63-7-83.
Covering of open top vehicles carrying sand, dirt, gravel or rock.

Every truck, trailer or other carrier with an open top, while traveling upon any state, United States or interstate highway in the State of Mississippi and while carrying any load of sand, dirt, gravel or rock shall be equipped with a tarpaulin, canvas or other such top and same to be secured over the top of any load of sand, dirt, gravel, or rock.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 63-7-85.
Use of sideboards on open top vehicles carrying sand, dirt, gravel or rock.

In lieu of the tarpaulin provided in Section 63-7-83, a truck, trailer or other carrier with an open top while traveling upon any state, United States or interstate highway in the State of Mississippi and while carrying any load of sand, dirt, gravel or rock shall be in full compliance with Sections 63-7-83 through 63-7-89 provided same is not loaded within six (6) inches of the top of the bed or is equipped with four (4) six-inch (6") sideboards, which sideboards shall be attached one (1) each to the front, back and two (2) sides of the carrier body, and shall remain lowered while the body is being loaded, provided that no part of the load shall extend above the body of the carrier. After loading, the sideboards shall be raised and secured to remain raised during travel, and the space between the top of the sideboards and the top of the load making contact with the sideboards shall not be less than six (6) inches.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 521, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 63-7-87.
Enforcement of §§ 63-7-83 and 63-7-85.

The State Tax Commission, Mississippi Highway Patrol and other law enforcement agencies are hereby charged with enforcement of Sections 63-7-83 through 63-7-89.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 521, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-7-89.
Penalties for violations of §§ 63-7-83 and 67-3-85.

Any person, firm or corporation operating a truck, trailer or other carrier on any state, United States or interstate highway not properly covered as set forth in Section 63-7-83 or without sideboards as set forth in Section 63-7-85 or in violation of any of the other provisions of said Section 63-7-85 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each separate and distinct violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 63-7-91.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; requirement.

When any vehicle, whether pulled, towed, self-propelled or animal-drawn, which is not under ordinary circumstances moved, operated or driven at a speed in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour, is moved, operated or driven on any public highway or city street which is open for vehicular travel, it shall display a triangular slow-moving-vehicle emblem or high intensity reflectorized tape mounted as near as practicable to the center of the mass and at an approximate height of not less than two (2) nor more than six (6) feet from level ground or pavement surface. In any event, the emblem or tape shall be mounted so as to be entirely visible from the rear, day or night; and the emblem or tape and its position of mounting on the vehicle shall meet the specifications established by rules and regulations properly adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety. Except in cases of emergency, vehicles subject to the provisions of this section that display the reflectorized tape shall not be operated upon any highway on the designated state highway system during the period from sunset to sunrise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 592, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-7-93.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; prohibition.

The use of the slow-moving-vehicle emblem or high intensity reflectorized tape shall be restricted to the slow-moving vehicles specified in Section 63-7-91 and the use of such emblem or tape on any other type of vehicle or stationary object on or along any public highway or city street is prohibited.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 592, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-7-95.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Public Safety is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards and specifications for the design, materials and mounting of a standard slow-moving-vehicle emblem and high intensity reflectorized tape for the uniform identification of slow-moving vehicles. In adopting said rules and regulations the Commissioner of Public Safety shall consider the standard markings used in other states, the current recommendations of the American Society of Agricultural Engineers and the Society of Automotive Engineers, in order that the slow-moving-vehicle emblem or tape may be more universally recognizable and of adequate quality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 592, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-7-97.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; relationship with other requirements as to lighting and safety equipment.

Nothing in Sections 63-7-91 through 63-7-101 shall be construed to relieve the owner and/or operator of the vehicles identified in Section 63-7-91 from complying with all other requirements for lighting and safety equipment on these vehicles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1975.

§ 63-7-99.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; presumption as to use of reasonable care in operation of vehicle.

Compliance with Section 63-7-91 shall not create a prima facie case or presumption that such owner or operator of the vehicle used reasonable and ordinary care in the operation of such vehicle under the circumstances then existing by the use or display of such slow-moving-vehicle emblem or high intensity reflectorized tape.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 592, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-7-101.
Slow-moving vehicle safety emblem; enforcement of provisions.

Sections 63-7-91 through 63-7-101 are hereby made a part of the Uniform Highway Traffic Regulation Law as amended, and their enforcement shall be as provided by said law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 346, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1975.

§ 63-7-103.
Trooper Steve Hood Act: The Nitrous Oxide Prohibition Act; use of nitrous oxide in motor vehicle or motorcycle driven on streets or highways prohibited; penalties.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Trooper Steve Hood Act: The Nitrous Oxide Prohibition Act.”

For the purposes of this section:

“Motor vehicle” has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3; however, the term “motor vehicle” does not include any vehicle with a gross vehicle or combination weight greater than ten thousand (10,000) pounds.

“Motorcycle” has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3.

“Nitrous oxide” means a gas or liquid form of nitrous oxide that is used to increase the speed or performance of a motor vehicle or motorcycle.

“Street” or “highway” means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.

(i) A person shall not operate on a street or highway a motor vehicle or motorcycle that is equipped to supply the engine with nitrous oxide unless the nitrous oxide supply system is made inoperative by means of disconnecting the nitrous oxide feed line from the engine or removing the nitrous oxide canister from the motor vehicle or motorcycle.

No fine or imprisonment shall be imposed against the operator for a violation of this section, unless at the time the operator was charged with a violation of this section he also was charged with some other offense under Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, and he is convicted of both offenses.

A person convicted for the first offense of violating this subsection shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than forty-eight (48) hours, or both.

For a second conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be fined not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) days nor more than one (1) year, and shall be sentenced to community service work for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year.

(i) For a third or subsequent conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and shall serve not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections; however, for any such offense that does not result in serious injury or death to any person, the sentence of incarceration may be served in the county jail at the discretion of the circuit court judge.

After a conviction under this subsection and upon receipt of the court abstract, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall suspend the driver’s license and driving privileges of the person for not less than five (5) years.

After a conviction under this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall seize the vehicle owned by any person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of this subsection, if the convicted person was driving the vehicle at the time the offense was committed. The vehicle may be forfeited in the manner provided by Sections 63-11-49 through 63-11-53.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.